Wyoming, session 2026, HB0016.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-1-305(a) by creating a new
paragraph (viii) is amended to read:
9-1-305. Fees; amounts; collection; exceptions.
(a) The secretary of state shall collect the
following fees in advance for:
(viii) Expediting the filing of any document
filed pursuant to title 17, title 34 or title 40, chapters
1 and 2 of the Wyoming statutes, an amount not more than
five thousand dollars ($5,000.00). Notwithstanding any
other law to the contrary, the secretary of state may
charge a fee as specified in this paragraph to expedite the
filing of a document filed with the secretary of state's
office pursuant to title 17, title 34 or title 40, chapters
1 and 2 of the Wyoming statutes upon the request of the
filer. The fee and process for requesting an expedited
filing shall be established by rule of the secretary of
state taking into account the impact the cost of the filing
fee may have on total filings, the costs of expediting the
filing and deadlines for responding to filings as required
by law. The expedition of a filing under this paragraph
shall not alter the prioritization of rights determined by
the timing of the filing.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0016
ENROLLED ACT NO. 36, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2